Wisconsin, session 2025, SB893.
do enact as follows:SB893,11Section 1. 48.14 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB893,2,3248.14 (2) (a) For a minor, where parental rights have been terminated under 3subch. VIII; or.SB893,24Section 2. 48.14 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB893,2,9548.14 (2) (b) The appointment and removal of a guardian of the person for a 6child under ss. 48.427, 48.43, 48.831, 48.832, 48.839 (4) (a), 48.977, and 48.978, and 7for a child found to be in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 because the 8child is without parent or guardian or because custody of the child has been 9relinquished under s. 48.195.SB893,310Section 3. 48.185 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB893,3,51148.185 (2) Guardianship and termination of parental rights 12proceedings. In an action under s. 48.41, venue shall be in the county where the 13birth parent or child resides at the time that the petition is filed. Subject to sub. (5), 14venue for any proceeding under s. 48.977 or any proceeding under subch. VIII when 15the child has been placed outside the home pursuant to a dispositional order under 16s. 48.345 or 48.347, shall be in the county where the dispositional order was issued, 17unless the child’s county of residence has changed or the parent of the child has 18resided in a different county of this state for 6 months. In either case, the Venue for 19any proceeding under s. 48.13 (2m) concerning a child whose custody has been 1relinquished under s. 48.195 shall be in the county in which the relinquishment 2occurred. Notwithstanding the venue specified in this subsection, the court may, 3upon a motion and for good cause shown, transfer the case any action or proceeding 4specified in this subsection, along with all appropriate records, to the county of 5residence of the child or parent.SB893,46Section 4. 48.417 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB893,3,16748.417 (1m) Relinquished child; when petition required. If the court has 8found probable cause to believe that a parent of the child has relinquished custody 9of the child as described in s. 48.13 (2m), the district attorney, corporation counsel, 10or other appropriate official designated under s. 48.09 of the county in which the 11relinquishment occurred shall file a petition under s. 48.42 (1) to terminate the 12parental rights of the parent or parents of the child or, if a petition under s. 48.42 (1) 13to terminate those parental rights has already been filed, shall join in the petition 14no earlier than 30 days after the date on which the child was relinquished and no 15later than 60 days after the date on which the court found probable cause to believe 16that the child was relinquished.SB893,517Section 5. Initial applicability.SB893,3,2018(1) Termination of parental rights of newborn child whose custody 19has been relinquished. This act first applies to a child whose custody is 20relinquished, as described in s. 48.195, on the effective date of this subsection.SB893,621Section 6. Effective date.SB893,3,2322(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 6th month beginning after 23publication.SB893,3,2424